Tennessee, session 114, SB1618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-10-106, is amended by deleting
subdivision (1) and substituting:
(1) A copy of the subpoena has been served upon the customer, if the customer
is available for service, in the manner provided by law for the service of subpoena, or, in
any judicial proceeding in which the customer is a named party, a copy of the subpoena
has been served on the customer in the manner provided for the service of pleadings
subsequent to the original complaint by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. If a
financial institution reasonably believes a customer is deceased, then the financial
institution does not have a duty to confirm service of a subpoena on the customer, the
customer's estate, or the customer's heirs; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-10-111, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
The copy of the records must be delivered to the issuer in the manner and
location specified in the subpoena. If the subpoena does not specify a manner of
delivery, then the records must be delivered by means of any method agreed upon by
the issuer and the custodian, including electronic submission. If the issuer and
custodian cannot agree to the manner of delivery, then the custodian may, at its option,
deliver the records to the attention of the issuer by physical delivery, U.S. mail, or by
means of a delivery service. If the location of the delivery of the records is not specified
in the subpoena, then the custodian shall deliver the records directly to the issuer.
SB1618
010756
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-10-112, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
Upon receipt of the records, the issuer shall retain the records in a secure and
confidential manner, and shall not disclose any of the records except to such persons or
entities entitled to view the records in connection with the proceeding under which the
subpoena was issued.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010756